Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2216.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) In 1990, the Congress of the United States created an immigration visa category known as Special Immigrant Juvenile Status, which extends protections to certain vulnerable youth.(2) Prior to seeking this Federal immigration visa, an applicant must first be in possession of a state court order containing certain factual determinations.(3) Under the Federal statutory scheme, state courts do not determine a youth's eligibility for Special Immigrant Juvenile Status.123456789101112131415161718 (4) Instead, state courts are tasked with making the following predicate factual findings regarding a juvenile:(i) Whether reunification of the juvenile with one or both of the juvenile's parents is not viable due to abuse, abandonment, neglect or similar basis under state law.(ii) Whether it would not be in the best interest of the juvenile to be returned to the country of nationality or last habitual residence of the juvenile or juvenile's parent.(5) Orders containing the factual determinations under paragraph (4) are referred to as Special Immigrant Juvenile Status Predicate Orders.Section 2. Chapter 63 of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER HSPECIAL IMMIGRANT JUVENILE STATUS PREDICATE ORDERSSec.6391. Definitions.6392. Jurisdiction.6393. Nonviability of reunification.6394. Best interest presumption.6395. Burden of proof and production.6396. Confidentiality.6397. Sua sponte authority.6398. Abuse of discretion.6399. Service or notice.§ 6391. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the 20260HB2216PN2910 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 context clearly indicates otherwise:"Juvenile." An individual under 21 years of age."Juvenile court." Orphans' court, custody court, juvenile court or any other court having jurisdiction under the laws of this Commonwealth to make determinations relevant to the well-being, welfare or best interest of a juvenile."Predicate factual findings." The factual determinations made by a juvenile court regarding a juvenile as to:(1) Whether reunification of the juvenile with one or both of the juvenile's parents is not viable due to abuse, abandonment, neglect or similar basis under State law.(2) Whether it would not be in the best interest of the juvenile to be returned to the country of nationality or last habitual residence of the juvenile or juvenile's parent."Predicate order." An order issued in connection with a juvenile court proceeding containing the predicate factual findings necessary to enable an immigrant juvenile to apply for Special Immigrant Juvenile Status.§ 6392. Jurisdiction.(a) Juvenile court authority.--A juvenile court shall have jurisdiction to enter a predicate order regarding an individual but only if the individual is a juvenile.(b) Predicate factual findings.--(1) The predicate factual findings regarding a juvenile need not be made at the same time or contained in the same order awarding custody, appointing a guardian, adjudicating a juvenile dependent or delinquent or granting any other form of protection to safeguard the well-being, welfare or best interests of the juvenile.(2) In making predicate factual findings, a juvenile 20260HB2216PN2910 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 court shall use the definitions of abandonment, abuse, neglect and best interest routinely applied under the relevant law of this Commonwealth.§ 6393. Nonviability of reunification.If a juvenile court finds that a juvenile has been abandoned, abused or neglected by one or both of the juvenile's parents, the juvenile court shall issue a predicate order finding that reunification of the juvenile with the juvenile's offending parent or parents is not viable due to the abandonment, abuse or neglect.§ 6394. Best interest presumption.If a juvenile court awards custody, appoints a guardian, adjudicates a juvenile dependent or delinquent or grants any other form of protection to safeguard the well-being, welfare or best interests of an immigrant juvenile, it shall be presumed that it is not in the best interest of the juvenile to be returned to the country of nationality or last habitual residence of the juvenile or juvenile's parent.§ 6395. Burden of proof and production.(a) Predicate orders.--The burden of proof for proving necessary facts for predicate orders is preponderance of evidence.(b) Testimony of juvenile.--The testimony of a juvenile standing alone, if deemed credible, is sufficient proof upon which to issue a predicate order. The testimony of the juvenile need not be supported by other evidence.(c) Construction.--Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to create an increased burden of proof or production.§ 6396. Confidentiality.Information regarding the immigration status of a juvenile 20260HB2216PN2910 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and any parties involved in a juvenile court proceeding under this subchapter shall be confidential to the extent not otherwise protected by State confidentiality law.§ 6397. Sua sponte authority.Nothing in this subchapter shall prevent a juvenile court from issuing a predicate order sua sponte if there is a factual basis for the predicate order.§ 6398. Abuse of discretion.A juvenile court commits an abuse of discretion if the juvenile court denies a party a meaningful opportunity to seek a predicate order or refuses to issue a predicate order if there is a factual basis for the predicate order.§ 6399. Service or notice.In a case involving an allegation of abandonment of a juvenile by a parent of the juvenile, the juvenile court may excuse the necessity of effectuating service on or other notice to the parent if the parent has abandoned the juvenile for a period of at least six months.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2216PN2910 - 5 - 12345678910111213141516171819